Maryland, session 2026, HB0590.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article 14 – Howard County
20.304.
(a) The Director of Finance shall collect and distribute transfer tax proceeds
attributable to the rate of the transfer tax imposed under section 20.301(a) of this subtitle
in the following manner:
(1) Twenty–five percent in a special fund known as “The School Site
Acquisition and Construction Fund,” and disbursements from this fund shall be made only
for the purposes set forth in section 9.102 of the Howard County Code;
(2) Twenty–five percent in a special fund known as “The Park Land
Watershed Facilities Fund,” and disbursements from this fund shall be made only for the
purposes set forth in section 19.100 of the Howard County Code; and
(3) The remainder in the general fund of the County, with the stipulation
that the County Council shall budget this remainder as follows:
(i) Fifty percent plus the interest thereon for the Howard County
Agricultural [Land] Preservation AND INNOVATION Fund TO SUPPORT THE
AGRICULTURAL LAND PRESERVATION PROGRAM AND OTHER PROGRAMS,
– 1 –

Ch. 346 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
SERVICES, OR INITIATIVES TO ENHANCE THE COMMERCIAL VIABILITY OR
ENVIRONMENTAL SUSTAINABILITY OF AGRICULTURE IN THE COUNTY;
(ii) Twenty–five percent for community improvement and housing
programs primarily serving low income individuals and families and the homeless and for
urban renewal; and
(iii) Twenty–five percent for the acquisition or leasing of land for new
fire house sites and training facilities and the construction and maintenance of fire house
and training facilities, the acquisition and maintenance of fire equipment, and
supplementation of financial needs of fire companies.
(b) The Director of Finance shall collect any proceeds attributable to an increase
in the transfer tax rate authorized under section 20.301(b) of this subtitle and distribute
the proceeds to the general fund of the County to be used in the following manner:
(1) Twenty–five percent for capital projects for the Howard County Public
School System;
(2) Twenty–five percent for capital projects for the Department of
Recreation and Parks;
(3) Twenty–five percent for community improvement and housing
programs primarily serving low income individuals and families and the homeless and for
urban renewal; and
(4) Twenty–five percent for the acquisition or leasing of land for new fire
house sites and training facilities and the construction and maintenance of fire house and
training facilities, the acquisition and maintenance of fire equipment, and supplementation
of financial needs of fire companies.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 28, 2026.
– 2 –